Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-106
Drainage improvements; change of proposed route; power of county board.

If the county board, upon actual view, shall find that the route proposed is not such as to best effect the object sought, it shall change the same and establish the route and determine the dimensions of the proposed improvements; Provided, any change so made shall not in any case exceed one hundred and sixty rods from the route described in the petition.

Laws 1881, c. 51, § 6, p. 237;

Laws 1911, c. 140, § 6, p. 455;

R.S.1913, § 1723;

C.S.1922, § 1670;

C.S.1929, § 31-106;

R.S.1943, § 31-106.